Washington statutes.
RCW 17.10.007

Purpose—Construction—1975 1st ex.s. c 13.

The purpose of this chapter is to limit economic loss and adverse effects to Washington's agricultural, natural, and human resources due to the presence and spread of noxious weeds on all terrestrial and aquatic areas in the state.

The intent of the legislature is that this chapter be liberally construed, and that the jurisdiction, powers, and duties granted to the county noxious weed control boards by this chapter are limited only by specific provisions of this chapter or other state and federal law.

[ 1997 c 353 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 13 s 17. Formerly RCW 17.10.905.]